Utah statutes.
7-7-40.   Federal associations.

(1)  Federal associations whose home state is Utah are not foreign corporations or  out-of-state associations.

(2)  Unless federal laws or regulations provide otherwise, these federal associations and their members or stockholders possess all of the rights, powers, privileges, benefits, immunities, and exemptions provided by the laws of this state for associations organized under the laws of this state and for their members or stockholders.

(3)  This provision is additional and supplemental to any provision that by specific reference is applicable to federal associations and their members or stockholders.



Amended by Chapter 49, 1995 General Session

